District of Columbia statutes.
19-1309.05

Reviewing compliance.

The prudent investor rule expresses a standard of conduct, not a particular outcome. Compliance with the prudent investor rule is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of a trustee’s decision or action.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208